Vermont, session 2025-2026, H163.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A § 601 is amended to read:
§ 601. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #380351 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.163
2025 Page 2 of 7
(13) “Wages” includes bonuses and the market value of health
insurance, board, lodging, fuel, and other advantages that can be estimated in
money and that the employee receives from the employer as a part of the
employee’s remuneration, but does not include any sum paid by the employer
to the employee to cover any special expenses entailed on the employee by the
nature of the employment.
* * *
(31) “Medical case management” means the planning and coordination
of health care services appropriate to achieve the goal of medical
rehabilitation.
(A) Medical case management may include medical case assessment,
including a personal interview with the injured employee; assistance in
developing, implementing, and coordinating a medical care plan with health
care providers in consultation with the injured employee and the employees’
family; and an evaluation of treatment results. The goal of medical case
management is to provide the injured employee with reasonable treatment
options to ensure that the injured employee can make an informed choice.
(B) Medical Case Managers shall not provide medical care or adjust
claims.
(C) An injured employee shall be entitled to medical case
management services if reasonably supported. Reasonable support includes a
VT LEG #380351 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.163
2025 Page 3 of 7
recommendation made by a health care provider or evidence demonstrating the
injured employee’s medical recovery would benefit from the services, or both.
Sec. 2 21 V.S.A. § 602 is amended to read:
§ 602. PROCESS AND PROCEDURE
* * *
(d) When an injured employee does not speak English fluently, the
employer shall pay for translation services to ensure the injured employee fully
understands the employee’s rights and can effectively participate in the
employee’s medical recovery and the workers’ compensation claims process.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. 640b is amended to read:
§ 640b. REQUEST FOR PREAUTHORIZATION TO DETERMINE IF
PROPOSED BENEFITS OR SERVICES ARE NECESSARY
(a) As used in this section,
(1) “benefits” means medical treatment and surgical, medical, and
nursing services and supplies, including prescription drugs and durable
medical equipment; and
(2) “services” means medical case management services.
* * *
(e) Within 14 days after receiving a request for preauthorization of
proposed medical case management services, the insurer shall do one of the
following, in writing:
VT LEG #380351 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.163
2025 Page 4 of 7
(1) Authorize the services and notify the injured employee, the
Department, and the treating provider recommending the services, if
applicable.
(2) Deny the services because the entire claim is disputed, and the
Commissioner has not issued an interim order to pay benefits. The insurer
shall notify the injured employee, the Department, and the treating provider
recommending the services, if applicable, of the decision to deny benefits.
(3) Deny the request if there is not reasonable support for the requested
services. The insurer shall notify the injured employee, the Department, and
the treating provider recommending the services, if applicable, of the decision
to deny benefits.
(4) Notify the injured employee, the Department, and the treating
provider recommending the services, if applicable, that the insurer has
scheduled an examination of the injured employee pursuant to section 655 of
this title or ordered a medical record review pursuant to section 655a of this
title. Based on the examination or review, the insurer shall notify the injured
employee and the Department of the decision within 45 days after a request for
preauthorization. The Commissioner may, in the Commissioner’s sole
discretion, grant a 10-day extension to the insurer to authorize or deny the
services, and such an extension shall not be subject to appeal.
VT LEG #380351 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.163
2025 Page 5 of 7
(f) If the insurer fails to authorize or deny the services pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section within 14 days after receiving a request, the
injured employee or the injured employee’s treating provider, if applicable,
may request that the Department issue an order authorizing services. After
receipt of the request, the Department shall issue an interim order within five
days after notice to the insurer, and five days in which to respond, absent
evidence that the entire claim is disputed. Upon request of a party, the
Commissioner shall notify the parties that the services have been authorized by
operation of law.
(g) If the insurer denies the preauthorization of the services pursuant to
subdivision (e)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, the Commissioner may, on the
Commissioner’s own initiative or upon a request by the injured worker, issue
an order authorizing the services if the Commissioner finds that the evidence
shows that the services are reasonably supported.
Sec. 4. 21 V.S.A. § 650 is amended to read:
§ 650. PAYMENT; AVERAGE WAGE; COMPUTATION
* * *
(f)(1)(A) When benefits have been awarded or are not in dispute as
provided in subsection (e) of this section, the employer shall establish a
weekday on which payment shall be mailed or deposited and notify the
VT LEG #380351 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.163
2025 Page 6 of 7
claimant and the Department of that day. The employer shall ensure that each
weekly payment is mailed or deposited on or before the day established.
(B) Payment shall be made by direct deposit to a claimant who elects
that payment method. The employer shall notify the claimant of the claimant’s
right to payment by direct deposit.
(2) If the benefit payment is not mailed or deposited on the day
established, or if the payment is not mailed or deposited within five business
days of the end of the pay period the payment covers, the employer shall pay to
the claimant a late fee equal to the greater of $10.00 or;
(A) five percent of the benefit amount, whichever is greater, for each
weekly the first payment that is made after the established day;
(B) 10 percent of the benefit amount for the second payment that is
made after the established day;
(C) 15 percent of the benefit amount for the third payment that is
made after the established day;
(D) 20 percent of the benefit amount for the fourth payment that is
made after the established day; and
(E) 25 percent of the benefit amount for the fifth and any subsequent
payments that are made after the established day.
(3) As used in this subsection, “paid” means the payment is mailed to
the claimant’s mailing address or, in the case of direct deposit, transferred into
VT LEG #380351 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.163
2025 Page 7 of 7
the designated account. In the event of a dispute, proof of payment shall be
established by affidavit.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380351 v.1